Maryland, session 2025, HB1549.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
1–1321.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC WORKS FOR EACH COUNTY IN WHICH A
WATER MAIN BREAK OR LEAK OCCURS SHALL PUBLISH ON THE DEPARTMENT’S
WEBSITE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(1) THE DATE THE DEPARTMENT WAS NOTIFIED OF THE BREAK OR
LEAK;
(2) THE DATE OF COMPLIANCE WITH ANY LEGAL AND REGULATORY
REQUIREMENTS BY THE RELEVANT WATER UTILITY;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1549*

HOUSE BILL 1549
(3) THE DATE OF REPAIR; AND
(4) THE ESTIMATED WATER LOSS.
(B) EACH DEPARTMENT SHALL UPDATE ANY INFORMATION PUBLISHED ON
ITS WEBSITE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER ANY
ACTION TAKEN IN RELATION TO A WATER MAIN BREAK OR LEAK.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.